Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 2 Fiscal Year

35-2-1.
State fiscal year.

The fiscal year shall be deemed to include the twelve (12) calendar months from July to June, both inclusive.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 35, § 1; G.L. 1909, ch. 45, § 1; P.L. 1922, ch. 2200, § 1; G.L. 1923, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1349, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 27, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-2-1

.

35-2-2.
Fiscal year in towns and cities.

The electors in a financial town meeting of any town qualified to vote on any proposition to impose a tax or for the expenditure of money, or the city council of any city, not having a fiscal year beginning July 1, may vote at any financial town or city council meeting, provided, that the fiscal year in the town or city in which a vote is passed shall thereafter begin with July 1 of each calendar year and end with June 30 of the following calendar year.

History of Section.

P.L. 1961, ch. 34, § 1.

35-2-3.
Town of North Providence fiscal year.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

35-2-2

, the budget commission of the town of North Providence, by vote at a meeting of the commission, is authorized to modify the fiscal year for a town over a four-year period, as follows:

Establishing a fiscal year from March 1 to March 31 of the following calendar year;

The succeeding fiscal year to be from April 1 to April 30 of the following calendar year;

The succeeding fiscal year to be May 1 to May 31 of the following calendar year;

The succeeding fiscal year to be from June 1 to June 30 of the following calendar year;

Thereafter the fiscal years to be July 1 to June 30 of the following calendar years.

In the event that the budget commission of the town of North Providence votes to modify the fiscal year as provided in this section, the commission shall ordain the dates upon which taxes shall be due and payable. The commission shall also determine by resolution the installments in which taxes may be paid, the dates on which penalties for nonpayment shall apply, and the rate of the penalties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1970, ch. 122, § 1.